pt-BR: Uso pretendido do acessório para cabeça: Perda de cabelo por quimioterapia; Moda; Cuidados com os cabelos; Médico ou cirúrgico; Religioso ou modéstia; Dormir; Esportes e atividades físicas; Proteção solar; Natação; Outro
sl-SI: Predviden namen uporabe pokrivala: Izguba las zaradi kemoterapije; Moda; Nega las; Medicinsko ali kirurško; Versko ali za zakrivanje; Spanje; Šport in rekreacija; Zaščita pred soncem; Plavanje; Drugo
fi: Päähineen käyttötarkoitus: Hiustenlähtö kemohoidossa; Muoti; Hiustenhoito; Lääketieteellinen tai kirurginen; Uskonnollinen tai säädyllisyys; Uni; Urheilu ja aktiivivaatetus; Aurinkosuoja; Uinti; Muu
hu: Fejfedő rendeltetése: Kemoterápiás hajhullás; Divat; Hajápolás; Orvosi vagy sebészeti; Vallási vagy szemérmességi; Alvás; Sport- és aktív ruházat; Napvédelem; Úszás; Egyéb
el: Προβλεπόμενη χρήση καλύμματος κεφαλής: Απώλεια μαλλιών λόγω χημειοθεραπείας; Μόδα; Περιποίηση μαλλιών; Ιατρική ή χειρουργική; Θρησκευτικοί λόγοι ή σεμνότητα; Ύπνος; Αθλητικά και ρούχα δραστηριοτήτων; Αντηλιακή προστασία; Κολύμβηση; Άλλο
en: Headwear intended use: Chemo hair loss; Fashion; Hair care; Medical or surgical; Religious or modesty; Sleep; Sports and activewear; Sun protection; Swim; Other
lt-LT: Galvos apdangalo paskirtis: Plaukų slinkimas dėl chemoterapijos; Mada; Plaukų priežiūra; Medicininė ar chirurginė; Religinė ar kuklumo; Miegas; Sportas ir aktyvus laisvalaikis; Apsauga nuo saulės; Plaukimas; Kita
vi: Mục đích sử dụng của khăn đội đầu: Rụng tóc do hóa trị; Thời trang; Chăm sóc tóc; Y tế hoặc phẫu thuật; Tôn giáo hoặc trang nhã; Đi ngủ; Thể thao và trang phục năng động; Chống nắng; Bơi lội; Khác
ja: 帽子の用途: 抗がん剤治療による脱毛用; ファッション用; ヘアケア用; 医療または手術用; 宗教または慎みのため; 睡眠用; スポーツ・アクティブウェア用; 日焼け防止用; 水泳用; その他
pt-PT: Utilização prevista do acessório de cabeça: Queda de cabelo por quimioterapia; Moda; Cuidados de cabelo; Uso médico ou cirúrgico; Religião ou modéstia; Dormir; Desporto e vestuário ativo; Proteção solar; Natação; Outro
bg-BG: Предназначение на покривалото за глава: Косопад от химиотерапия; Мода; Грижа за косата; Медицинска или хирургична; Религия или скромност; Сън; Спорт и активно облекло; Слънцезащита; Плуване; Други
sk-SK: Určenie použitia hlavového dielu: Strata vlasov z chemoterapie; Móda; Starostlivosť o vlasy; Lekárske alebo chirurgické; Náboženské alebo z dôvodu skromnosti; Spánok; Šport a aktívny pohyb; Ochrana pred slnkom; Plávanie; Iné
hr-HR: Namjena pokrivala za glavu: Gubitak kose zbog kemoterapije; Moda; Njega kose; Medicinsko ili kirurško; Vjersko ili iz čednosti; Spavanje; Sport i aktivnosti; Zaštita od sunca; Plivanje; Ostalo
nb: Tiltenkt bruk av hodeplagg: Hårtap ved cellegift; Mote; Hårpleie; Medisinsk eller kirurgisk; Religiøst eller anstendighet; Søvn; Sport og treningstøy; Solbeskyttelse; Svømming; Annet
es: Uso previsto de los sombreros: Pérdida de cabello por quimio; Moda; Cuidado del cabello; Médico o quirúrgico; Religioso o de modestia; Dormir; Deportes y ropa activa; Protección solar; Natación; Otro
fr: Usage prévu du couvre-chef: Chimiothérapie/perte de cheveux; Mode; Soin capillaire; Médical ou chirurgical; Religieux ou pudeur; Sommeil; Sport et vêtements de sport; Protection solaire; Natation; Autre
tr: Başlık kullanım amacı: Kemoterapi saç dökülmesi; Moda; Saç bakımı; Tıbbi veya cerrahi; Dini veya tesettür; Uyku; Spor ve aktif giyim; Güneş koruması; Yüzme; Diğer
zh-TW: 頭部穿戴用品預定用途: 化療落髮; 時尚; 護髮; 醫療或手術; 宗教或端莊; 睡眠; 運動與活動服飾; 防曬; 游泳; 其他
de: Vorgesehene Verwendung der Kopfbedeckung: Haarausfall durch Chemo; Mode; Haarpflege; Medizinisch oder chirurgisch; Religion oder Bedeckung; Schlafen; Sport und Activewear; Sonnenschutz; Schwimmen; Sonstige
nl: Hoofdbedekking beoogd gebruik: Chemohaaruitval; Mode; Haarverzorging; Medisch of chirurgisch; Religie of ingetogenheid; Slapen; Sport en activewear; Zonbescherming; Zwemmen; Overig
ko: 모자의 용도: 항암 탈모용; 패션용; 헤어 케어용; 의료용 또는 수술용; 종교용 또는 단정함; 수면용; 스포츠 및 액티브웨어; 자외선 차단용; 수영용; 기타
da: Tilsigtet anvendelse af hovedbeklædning: Hårtab ved kemo; Mode; Hårpleje; Medicinsk eller kirurgisk; Religiøst eller blufærdighed; Søvn; Sport og aktivt tøj; Solbeskyttelse; Svømning; Andet
th: วัตถุประสงค์การใช้งานอุปกรณ์สวมศีรษะ: ผมร่วงจากคีโม; แฟชั่น; การดูแลเส้นผม; การแพทย์หรือศัลยกรรม; ศาสนาหรือความสุภาพเรียบร้อย; การนอนหลับ; กีฬาและแอคทีฟแวร์; การกันแดด; ว่ายน้ำ; อื่นๆ
ru: Предполагаемое назначение головного убора: При потере волос/химиотерапии; Модный аксессуар; Уход за волосами; Медицинское или хирургическое назначение; Религиозное назначение или скромность; Для сна; Спорт и активный отдых; Защита от солнца; Плавание; Другое
it: Uso previsto del copricapo: Perdita di capelli per chemio; Moda; Cura dei capelli; Medico o chirurgico; Religioso o pudore; Sonno; Sport e abbigliamento sportivo; Protezione solare; Nuoto; Altro
cs: Účel použití pokrývky hlavy: Vypadávání vlasů po chemoterapii; Móda; Péče o vlasy; Lékařské nebo chirurgické; Náboženství nebo skromnost; Na spaní; Sport a aktivní nošení; Ochrana proti slunci; Na plavání; Jiné
ro-RO: Utilizarea preconizată a accesoriilor pentru cap: Căderea părului (chimioterapie); Modă; Îngrijirea părului; Medical sau chirurgical; Religios sau modestie; Somn; Sport și activități fizice; Protecție solară; Înot; Altele
sv: Avsedd användning av huvudbonad: Håravfall vid cellgifter; Mode; Hårvård; Medicinsk eller kirurgisk; Religiös eller anständighet; Sömn; Sport och träning; Solskydd; Simning; Övrigt
zh-CN: 头戴设备预期用途: 化疗脱发; 时尚; 护发; 医疗或手术; 宗教或端庄; 睡眠; 运动及运动服; 防晒; 游泳; 其他
pl: Przeznaczenie nakrycia głowy: Utrata włosów po chemioterapii; Moda; Pielęgnacja włosów; Medyczne lub chirurgiczne; Religijne lub ze względów obyczajowych; Do spania; Sportowe i do aktywności fizycznej; Ochrona przed słońcem; Pływanie; Inne